Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 15. Tobacco Importation

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21 Am. Jur. 2d Customs Duties and Import Regulations §§ 375 to 377.

§ 35-7-1501.
Federal requirements; placement of labels; penalty.

No person shall import into this state any package of cigarettes that violates any federal requirement for the placement of labels, warnings, or other information, including health hazards, required to be placed on the container or individual package.

No person shall sell or offer to sell a package of cigarettes or affix the stamp or imprint required by W.S.

39-18-101

et seq. on a package of cigarettes unless that package of cigarettes complies with all federal tax laws, federal trademark and copyright laws, and federal laws regarding the placement of labels, warnings or any other information upon a package of cigarettes.

No person shall sell or offer to sell a package of cigarettes or affix the stamp or imprint required by W.S.

39-18-101

et seq. on a package of cigarettes if the package is marked as manufactured for use outside of the United States or if any label or language has been altered from the manufacturer’s original packaging and labeling to conceal the fact that the package was manufactured for use outside of the United States.

No person shall affix a stamp, label or decal on a package of cigarettes to conceal the fact that the package was manufactured for use outside of the United States.

No person shall sell or offer to sell a package of cigarettes on which a stamp, label or decal was affixed to conceal the fact that the package was manufactured for use outside of the United States.

The violation of any provision of this section is a misdemeanor punishable as provided by W.S.

6-10-104

.

Any package of cigarettes found at any place in this state that is marked for use outside of the United States is declared to be contraband goods and may be seized without a warrant by the department of revenue, by its agents or employees, or by any peace officer in this state when directed or requested by the department to do so. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the department to confiscate packages of cigarettes that are so marked when it has reason to believe that the owner possesses the cigarettes for personal use and not for resale.

Any cigarettes seized by virtue of the provisions of subsection (g) of this section shall be confiscated, and the department shall destroy the confiscated goods.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 115, § 1.

§ 35-7-1502.
Federal requirements; affixing labels; penalty.

No person shall import into this state any tobacco product that violates any federal requirement for the placement of labels, warnings, or other information, including health hazards, required to be placed on the container or individual package.

No person shall sell or offer to sell any tobacco product unless the package or container of the tobacco product complies with all federal tax laws, federal trademark and copyright laws, and federal laws regarding the placement of labels, warnings, or any other information upon a package or container of tobacco products.

No person shall sell or offer to sell any tobacco product if the package or container is marked as manufactured for use outside of the United States or if any label or language has been altered from the manufacturer’s original packaging and labeling to conceal the fact that the package or container of tobacco products was manufactured for use outside of the United States.

No person shall affix a stamp, label, or decal on a package or container of tobacco products to conceal the fact that the package or container of tobacco products was manufactured for use outside of the United States.

No person shall sell or offer to sell any tobacco product on which a stamp, label, or decal was affixed to conceal the fact that the package or container of tobacco products was manufactured for use outside of the United States.

The violation of any provision of this section is a misdemeanor punishable as provided by W.S.

6-10-104

.

Any package or container of tobacco products found at any place in this state that is marked for use outside of the United States is declared to be contraband goods and may be seized without a warrant by the department of revenue, its agents or employees, or by any peace officer in this state when directed or requested by the department to do so. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the department to confiscate packages or containers of tobacco products that are so marked when it has reason to believe that the owner possesses the tobacco products for personal use and not for resale.

Any tobacco products seized by virtue of the provisions of subsection (g) of this section shall be confiscated, and the department shall destroy the confiscated goods.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 115, § 1.